Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1434
Data; compilation; report.

(1) The commission shall:

(a) Compile the data submitted pursuant to sections 85-1432 and 85-1433;

(b) Make such data publicly available on its website in an aggregated, searchable, and downloadable format; and

(c) On or before December 31 of each year, publish an annual report.

(2) Data reported publicly under this section shall not include the names of individual employees or other personally identifiable information.

Laws 2026, LB956, § 5.
July 1, 2026